Washington statutes.
RCW 18.215.080

Uniform disciplinary act—Application to chapter.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unregistered practice, the issuance and denial of registration, and the discipline of persons registered under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 1999 c 335 s 9.]